Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.230

Public nuisance—Abatement.

Any person may abate a public nuisance which is specially injurious to him or her by removing, or if necessary, destroying the thing which constitutes the same, without committing a breach of the peace, or doing unnecessary injury.

[ 2011 c 336 s 219; Code 1881 s 1245; 1875 p 80 s 11; RRS s 9923.]